New York, session 2025-2026, S8841.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The tax law is amended by adding a new section 171-bb to 2 read as follows: 3 § 171-bb. Donate life registry. 1. For the purposes of this section, 4 the term "donate life registry" shall mean the New York state donate 5 life registry for organ, eye and tissue donations established pursuant 6 to section forty-three hundred ten of the public health law. 7 2. For each taxable year beginning on or after January first, two 8 thousand twenty-seven, the department shall include an opportunity on 9 resident income tax returns prepared and filed through commercial tax 10 preparation software approved by the commissioner to allow each individ- 11 ual filing such a tax return, including spouses filing a joint return, 12 heads of households, or surviving spouses, to provide written consent 13 for the donate life registry to enroll such individual in the donate 14 life registry, and for the department to share such individual's infor- 15 mation with the donate life registry as provided under subdivision three 16 of this section. 17 3. Beginning on and after January first, two thousand twenty-seven, 18 notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the depart- 19 ment shall provide to the donate life registry information from each 20 resident individual's income tax return that provides such individual's 21 written consent to enroll in the donate life registry and to share such 22 individual's information with the donate life registry including but not 23 limited to, an individual's name, social security number, and additional 24 data. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10817-10-6 S. 8841--A 2 1 4. The operator of the donate life registry shall use the information 2 received from the department pursuant to this section for the purposes 3 of enrolling individuals in the donate life registry. 4 5. On or before January first, two thousand twenty-seven, the depart- 5 ment shall enter into a data sharing agreement with the donate life 6 registry that is consistent with the provisions of this section. 7 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 4310 of the public 8 health law, as amended by section 2 of chapter 128 of the laws of 2025, 9 is amended to read as follows: 10 (a) Such organ, eye and tissue registration of consent to make an 11 anatomical gift can be made through: (i) indication made on the applica- 12 tion or renewal form of a driver's license, (ii) indication made on a 13 non-driver identification card application or renewal form, (iii) indi- 14 cation made on a voter registration form pursuant to subdivision five of 15 section 5-210 of the election law, (iv) indication made on the applica- 16 tion for, or manual renewal application by an account holder of, health 17 care coverage offered through the state health benefit exchange, (v) 18 enrollment through the donate life registry website, (vi) paper enroll- 19 ment submitted to the donate life registry, (vii) indication made on the 20 application or renewal form of a hunting, fishing or trapping license 21 issued pursuant to title seven of article eleven of the environmental 22 conservation law, (viii) indication made on transactions administered by 23 the office of temporary and disability assistance through the mybene- 24 fits.ny.gov website, or any such successor website; (ix) indication made 25 on applications, renewals or related transactions for college financial 26 aid, grants, or scholarships offered or administered through any website 27 maintained by the higher education services corporation; (x) trans- 28 actions conducted through the patient-facing portal of an individual's 29 electronic health records; [or] (xi) indication made on any personal 30 income tax document in accordance with the provisions of section one 31 hundred seventy-one-bb of the tax law; or (xii) through any other method 32 identified by the commissioner. The department shall establish a means 33 by which to register the consent given by individuals who are sixteen or 34 seventeen years of age in the donate life registry, and shall make 35 registration available by any of the methods provided in subparagraphs 36 (i), (ii), (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), (vii), (viii), (ix), (x) [and], (xi) 37 and (xii) of this paragraph. 38 § 3. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 4310 of the public 39 health law, as amended by section 3 of chapter 128 of the laws of 2025, 40 is amended to read as follows: 41 (a) Such organ, eye and tissue registration of consent to make an 42 anatomical gift can be made through: (i) indication made on the applica- 43 tion or renewal form of a driver's license, (ii) indication made on a 44 non-driver identification card application or renewal form, (iii) indi- 45 cation made on a voter registration form pursuant to subdivision five of 46 section 5-210 of the election law, (iv) indication made on the applica- 47 tion for, or manual renewal application by an account holder of, health 48 care coverage offered through the NY State of Health, the official 49 Health Plan Marketplace, (v) enrollment through the donate life registry 50 website, (vi) paper enrollment submitted to the donate life registry, 51 (vii) indication made on the application or renewal form of a hunting, 52 fishing or trapping license issued pursuant to title seven of article 53 eleven of the environmental conservation law, (viii) indication made on 54 transactions administered by the office of temporary and disability 55 assistance through the mybenefits.ny.gov website, or any such successor 56 website; (ix) indication made on applications, renewals or related tran- S. 8841--A 3 1 sactions for college financial aid, grants, or scholarships offered or 2 administered through any website maintained by the higher education 3 services corporation; (x) indication made by an insured and/or applicant 4 for insurance during enrollments, renewals, and the initial process for 5 an insured in setting up an online member service portal with their 6 insurer for accident and health insurance policies and contracts issued 7 pursuant to article forty-four of this chapter, article forty-two of the 8 insurance law, or article forty-three of the insurance law, excepting 9 renewals made through the NY State of Health, the official Health Plan 10 Marketplace, other than those specifically referenced in subparagraph 11 (iv) of this paragraph and paragraph (v) of subdivision one of section 12 two hundred six of this chapter; and provided, however, that nothing in 13 this section shall apply to the medical assistance program under title 14 eleven of article five of the social services law; (xi) transactions 15 conducted through the patient-facing portal of an individual's electron- 16 ic health record; [or] (xii) indication made on any personal income tax 17 document in accordance with the provisions of section one hundred seven- 18 ty-one-bb of the tax law; or (xiii) through any other method identified 19 by the commissioner. The department shall establish a means by which to 20 register the consent given by individuals who are sixteen or seventeen 21 years of age in the donate life registry, and shall make registration 22 available by any of the methods provided in subparagraphs (i), (ii), 23 (iii), (iv), (v), (vi), (vii), (viii), (ix), (x), (xi) [and], (xii) and 24 (xiii) of this paragraph. 25 § 4. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 5 of section 26 4310 of the public health law, as amended by section 4 of chapter 662 of 27 the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 28 (i) Where required by law for transactions described in subparagraphs 29 (i), (ii), (iv), (vii), (viii), (ix), (x) [and], (xi) and (xii) of para- 30 graph (a) of this subdivision, the commissioner shall ensure, in consul- 31 tation with the head of any agency required to implement such trans- 32 action, that space is provided on any required form so that the 33 applicant shall register or decline registration in the donate life 34 registry for organ, eye and tissue donations under this section and that 35 the following is stated on the form in clear and conspicuous type: 36 "You must fill out the following section: Would you like to be added 37 to the Donate Life Registry? Check box for 'yes' or 'skip this ques- 38 tion'." 39 § 5. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 5 of section 40 4310 of the public health law, as amended by section 5 of chapter 662 of 41 the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 42 (i) Where required by law for transactions described in subparagraphs 43 (i), (ii), (iv), (vii), (viii), (ix), (x), (xi) [and], (xii) and (xiii) 44 of paragraph (a) of this subdivision, the commissioner shall ensure, in 45 consultation with the head of any agency required to implement such 46 transaction, that space is provided on any required form so that the 47 applicant shall register or decline registration in the donate life 48 registry for organ, eye and tissue donations under this section and that 49 the following is stated on the form in clear and conspicuous type: 50 "You must fill out the following section: Would you like to be added 51 to the Donate Life Registry? Check box for 'yes' or 'skip this ques- 52 tion'." 53 § 6. Paragraph 1 of subsection (e) of section 697 of the tax law, as 54 amended by chapter 477 of the laws of 1998, is amended to read as 55 follows: S. 8841--A 4 1 (1) Except in accordance with proper judicial order, section one 2 hundred seventy-one-bb of this chapter, or as otherwise provided by law, 3 it shall be unlawful for the commissioner, any officer or employee of 4 the department, any person engaged or retained by such department on an 5 independent contract basis, any depositary to which any return may be 6 delivered as provided in subsection (h) or (i) of this section, any 7 officer or employee of such depositary, or any person who, pursuant to 8 this section, is permitted to inspect any report or return or to whom a 9 copy, an abstract or a portion of any report or return is furnished, or 10 to whom any information contained in any report or return is furnished, 11 to divulge or make known in any manner the amount of income or any 12 particulars set forth or disclosed in any report or return required 13 under this article, under section one hundred seventy-one-a or section 14 one hundred seventy-one-h of this chapter, or under this article and 15 article eighteen of the labor law. 16 § 7. The opening paragraph of paragraph 3 of subsection (e) of section 17 697 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 284 of the laws of 2016, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the department, its 20 officers or employees from furnishing information to the office of 21 temporary and disability assistance relating to the payment of the cred- 22 it for certain household and dependent care services necessary for gain- 23 ful employment under subsection (c) of section six hundred six of this 24 article and the earned income credit under subsection (d) of section six 25 hundred six of this article and the enhanced earned income credit under 26 subsection (d-1) of section six hundred six of this article, or pursuant 27 to a local law enacted by a city having a population of one million or 28 more pursuant to subsection (f) of section thirteen hundred ten of this 29 chapter, only to the extent necessary to calculate qualified state 30 expenditures under paragraph seven of subdivision (a) of section four 31 hundred nine of the federal social security act or to document the prop- 32 er expenditure of federal temporary assistance for needy families funds 33 under section four hundred three of such act. The office of temporary 34 and disability assistance may redisclose such information to the United 35 States department of health and human services only to the extent neces- 36 sary to calculate such qualified state expenditures or to document the 37 proper expenditure of such federal temporary assistance for needy fami- 38 lies funds. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the delivery 39 by the commissioner to a commissioner of jurors, appointed pursuant to 40 section five hundred four of the judiciary law, or, in counties within 41 cities having a population of one million or more, to the county clerk 42 of such county, or to the clerk of the court or jury administrator of a 43 United States district court appointed pursuant to title twenty-eight of 44 the United States Code, section 1836(b)(2), of a mailing list of indi- 45 viduals to whom income tax forms are mailed by the commissioner for the 46 sole purpose of compiling a list of prospective jurors as provided in 47 article sixteen of the judiciary law or title twenty-eight of the United 48 States Code. Provided, however, such delivery shall only be made pursu- 49 ant to an order of the chief administrator of the courts, appointed 50 pursuant to section two hundred ten of the judiciary law or an order of 51 a chief judge of any United States district court in New York State. No 52 such order may be issued unless such chief administrator or chief judge 53 of such United States district court is satisfied that such mailing list 54 is needed to compile a proper list of prospective jurors for the county 55 or such United States district court for which such order is sought and 56 that, in view of the responsibilities imposed by the various laws of the S. 8841--A 5 1 state on the department, it is reasonable to require the commissioner to 2 furnish such list. Such order shall provide that such list shall be used 3 for the sole purpose of compiling a list of prospective jurors and that 4 such commissioner of jurors, or such county clerk, or clerk of the court 5 or jury administrator of such United States district court shall take 6 all necessary steps to insure that the list is kept confidential and 7 that there is no unauthorized use or disclosure of such list. Further- 8 more, nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the delivery to a 9 taxpayer or [his or her] their duly authorized representative of a 10 certified copy of any return or report filed in connection with [his or 11 her] their tax or to prohibit the publication of statistics so classi- 12 fied as to prevent the identification of particular reports or returns 13 and the items thereof, or the inspection by the attorney general or 14 other legal representatives of the state of the report or return of any 15 taxpayer or of any employer filed under section one hundred 16 seventy-one-h of this chapter, where such taxpayer or employer shall 17 bring action to set aside or review the tax based thereon, or against 18 whom an action or proceeding under this chapter or under this chapter 19 and article eighteen of the labor law has been recommended by the 20 commissioner, the commissioner of labor with respect to unemployment 21 insurance matters, or the attorney general or has been instituted, or 22 the inspection of the reports or returns required under this article by 23 the comptroller or duly designated officer or employee of the state 24 department of audit and control, for purposes of the audit of a refund 25 of any tax paid by a taxpayer under this article, or the furnishing to 26 the state department of labor of unemployment insurance information 27 obtained or derived from quarterly combined withholding, wage reporting 28 and unemployment insurance returns required to be filed by employers 29 pursuant to paragraph four of subsection (a) of section six hundred 30 seventy-four of this article, for purposes of administration of such 31 department's unemployment insurance program, employment services 32 program, federal and state employment and training programs, employment 33 statistics and labor market information programs, worker protection 34 programs, federal programs for which the department has administrative 35 responsibility or for other purposes deemed appropriate by the commis- 36 sioner of labor consistent with the provisions of the labor law, and 37 redisclosure of such information in accordance with the provisions of 38 sections five hundred thirty-six and five hundred thirty-seven of the 39 labor law or any other applicable law, or the furnishing to the state 40 office of temporary and disability assistance of information obtained or 41 derived from New York state personal income tax returns as described in 42 paragraph (b) of subdivision two of section one hundred seventy-one-g of 43 this chapter for the purpose of reviewing support orders enforced pursu- 44 ant to title six-A of article three of the social services law to aid in 45 the determination of whether such orders should be adjusted, or the 46 furnishing of information obtained from the reports required to be 47 submitted by employers regarding newly hired or re-hired employees 48 pursuant to section one hundred seventy-one-h of this chapter to the 49 state office of temporary and disability assistance, the state depart- 50 ment of health, the state department of labor and the workers' compen- 51 sation board for purposes of administration of the child support 52 enforcement program, verification of individuals' eligibility for one or 53 more of the programs specified in subsection (b) of section eleven 54 hundred thirty-seven of the federal social security act and for other 55 public assistance programs authorized by state law, and administration 56 of the state's employment security and workers' compensation programs, S. 8841--A 6 1 and to the national directory of new hires established pursuant to 2 section four hundred fifty-three-A of the federal social security act 3 for the purposes specified in such section, or the furnishing to the 4 state office of temporary and disability assistance of the amount of an 5 overpayment of income tax and interest thereon certified to the comp- 6 troller to be credited against past-due support pursuant to section one 7 hundred seventy-one-c of this chapter and of the name and social securi- 8 ty number of the taxpayer who made such overpayment, or the disclosing 9 to the commissioner of finance of the city of New York, pursuant to 10 section one hundred seventy-one-l of this chapter, of the amount of an 11 overpayment and interest thereon certified to the comptroller to be 12 credited against a city of New York tax warrant judgment debt and of the 13 name and social security number of the taxpayer who made such overpay- 14 ment, or the furnishing to the New York state higher education services 15 corporation of the amount of an overpayment of income tax and interest 16 thereon certified to the comptroller to be credited against the amount 17 of a default in repayment of any education loan debt, including judg- 18 ments, owed to the federal or New York state government that is being 19 collected by the New York state higher education services corporation, 20 and of the name and social security number of the taxpayer who made such 21 overpayment, or the furnishing to the state department of health of the 22 information required by paragraph (f) of subdivision two and subdivision 23 two-a of section two thousand five hundred eleven of the public health 24 law and by subdivision eight of section three hundred sixty-six-a of the 25 social services law, or the furnishing to the state university of New 26 York or the city university of New York respectively or the attorney 27 general on behalf of such state or city university the amount of an 28 overpayment of income tax and interest thereon certified to the comp- 29 troller to be credited against the amount of a default in repayment of a 30 state university loan pursuant to section one hundred seventy-one-e of 31 this chapter and of the name and social security number of the taxpayer 32 who made such overpayment, or the disclosing to a state agency, pursuant 33 to section one hundred seventy-one-f of this chapter, of the amount of 34 an overpayment and interest thereon certified to the comptroller to be 35 credited against a past-due legally enforceable debt owed to such agency 36 and of the name and social security number of the taxpayer who made such 37 overpayment, or the furnishing of employee and employer information 38 obtained through the wage reporting system, pursuant to section one 39 hundred seventy-one-a of this chapter, as added by chapter five hundred 40 forty-five of the laws of nineteen hundred seventy-eight, to the state 41 office of temporary and disability assistance, the department of health 42 or to the state office of the medicaid inspector general for the purpose 43 of verifying eligibility for and entitlement to amounts of benefits 44 under the social services law or similar law of another jurisdiction, 45 locating absent parents or other persons legally responsible for the 46 support of applicants for or recipients of public assistance and care 47 under the social services law and persons legally responsible for the 48 support of a recipient of services under section one hundred eleven-g of 49 the social services law and, in appropriate cases, establishing support 50 obligations pursuant to the social services law and the family court act 51 or similar provision of law of another jurisdiction for the purpose of 52 evaluating the effect on earnings of participation in employment, train- 53 ing or other programs designed to promote self-sufficiency authorized 54 pursuant to the social services law by current recipients of public 55 assistance and care and by former applicants and recipients of public 56 assistance and care, (except that with regard to former recipients, S. 8841--A 7 1 information which relates to a particular former recipient shall be 2 provided with client identifying data deleted), to the state office of 3 temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of determining the 4 eligibility of any child in the custody, care and custody or custody and 5 guardianship of a local social services district or of the office of 6 children and family services for federal payments for foster care and 7 adoption assistance pursuant to the provisions of title IV-E of the 8 federal social security act by providing information with respect to the 9 parents, the stepparents, the child and the siblings of the child who 10 were living in the same household as such child during the month that 11 the court proceedings leading to the child's removal from the household 12 were initiated, or the written instrument transferring care and custody 13 of the child pursuant to the provisions of section three hundred fifty- 14 eight-a or three hundred eighty-four-a of the social services law was 15 signed, provided however that the office of temporary and disability 16 assistance shall only use the information obtained pursuant to this 17 subdivision for the purpose of determining the eligibility of such child 18 for federal payments for foster care and adoption assistance pursuant to 19 the provisions of title IV-E of the federal social security act, and to 20 the state department of labor, or other individuals designated by the 21 commissioner of labor, for the purpose of the administration of such 22 department's unemployment insurance program, employment services 23 program, federal and state employment and training programs, employment 24 statistics and labor market information programs, worker protection 25 programs, federal programs for which the department has administrative 26 responsibility or for other purposes deemed appropriate by the commis- 27 sioner of labor consistent with the provisions of the labor law, and 28 redisclosure of such information in accordance with the provisions of 29 sections five hundred thirty-six and five hundred thirty-seven of the 30 labor law, or the furnishing of information, which is obtained from the 31 wage reporting system operated pursuant to section one hundred seventy- 32 one-a of this chapter, as added by chapter five hundred forty-five of 33 the laws of nineteen hundred seventy-eight, to the state office of 34 temporary and disability assistance so that it may furnish such informa- 35 tion to public agencies of other jurisdictions with which the state 36 office of temporary and disability assistance has an agreement pursuant 37 to paragraph (h) or (i) of subdivision three of section twenty of the 38 social services law, and to the state office of temporary and disability 39 assistance for the purpose of fulfilling obligations and responsibil- 40 ities otherwise incumbent upon the state department of labor, under 41 section one hundred twenty-four of the federal family support act of 42 nineteen hundred eighty-eight, by giving the federal parent locator 43 service, maintained by the federal department of health and human 44 services, prompt access to such information as required by such act, or 45 to the state department of health to verify eligibility under the child 46 health insurance plan pursuant to subdivisions two and two-a of section 47 two thousand five hundred eleven of the public health law, to verify 48 eligibility under the medical assistance and family health plus programs 49 pursuant to subdivision eight of section three hundred sixty-six-a of 50 the social services law, and to verify eligibility for the program for 51 elderly pharmaceutical insurance coverage under title three of article 52 two of the elder law, or to the office of vocational and educational 53 services for individuals with disabilities of the education department, 54 the commission for the blind and any other state vocational rehabili- 55 tation agency, for purposes of obtaining reimbursement from the federal 56 social security administration for expenditures made by such office, S. 8841--A 8 1 commission or agency on behalf of disabled individuals who have achieved 2 economic self-sufficiency or to the higher education services corpo- 3 ration for the purpose of assisting the corporation in default 4 prevention and default collection of education loan debt, including 5 judgments, owed to the federal or New York state government; provided, 6 however, that such information shall be limited to the names, social 7 security numbers, home and/or business addresses, and employer names of 8 defaulted or delinquent student loan borrowers, or to the office of the 9 state comptroller for purposes of verifying the income of a retired 10 member of a retirement system or pension plan administered by the state 11 or any of its political subdivisions who returns to public employment, 12 or to the New York state donate life registry established pursuant to 13 section forty-three hundred ten of the public health law for the 14 purposes of enrolling individuals as organ donors pursuant to section 15 one hundred seventy-one-bb of this chapter. 16 § 8. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 17 it shall have become a law; provided, however, that if section 3 of 18 chapter 128 of the laws of 2025 shall not have taken effect on or before 19 such date then section three of this act shall take effect on the same 20 date and in the same manner as such section of such chapter of the laws 21 of 2025, takes effect; and provided further, that if section 5 of chap- 22 ter 662 of the laws of 2024 shall not have taken effect on or before 23 such date then section five of this act shall take effect on the same 24 date and in the same manner as such section of such chapter of the laws 25 of 2024, takes effect. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 26 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 27 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 28 completed on or before such effective date.